Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-414.04
Controlled substance; transfer.

A registrant who
is the owner of a controlled substance may transfer:

(1) Any controlled
substance listed in Schedule I or II of section 28-405 to another registrant
as provided by law or by rule and regulation of the department; and

(2) Any controlled
substance listed in Schedule III, IV, or V of section 28-405 to another registrant
if such owner complies with subsection (4) of section 28-411.

Laws 2014, LB811, § 10.